Louisiana, session 2026, HB1247.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 15:622(A)(introductory paragraph) and (3) through (5),
624(A)(1)(introductory paragraph) and (B) through (D), and 624.1(B)(2), (C), and (I) are
hereby amended and reenacted and R.S. 15:555(A)(18), 557, 622(A)(6) and (7), and 624(E)
and (F) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
CHAPTER 3-C. LOUISIANA SEXUAL ASSAULT OVERSIGHT COMMISSION
§555. Louisiana Sexual Assault Oversight Commission; creation; membership;
meetings
A. The Louisiana Sexual Assault Oversight Commission is hereby created
within the Department of Justice, office of the attorney general. The commission
shall consist of the following members:
* * *
(18) The statewide sexual assault nurse examiner, or SANE, coordinator or
his designee.
* * *
§557. Louisiana Sexual Assault Oversight Commission; sexual assault response
standards subcommittee
A. The Sexual Assault Response Standards Subcommittee, referred to in this
Section as the "subcommittee", is hereby established as a subcommittee of the
Louisiana Sexual Assault Oversight Commission. The duties of the subcommittee
are as follows:
(1) Provide recommendations relative to sexual assault nurse examiner, or
SANE, training protocols that include but are not limited to didactic, clinical, and
preceptor training in accordance with available best practices per a national training
organization in order to establish state sanctioned credentialing.
(2) Provide recommendations relative to the standards and criteria of a
statewide registry of SANE-trained and SANE-credentialed nurses or healthcare
Page 2 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
providers and provide recommendations regarding the appropriate state agencies to
maintain and administer the registry.
(3) Provide recommendations relative to statewide sexual assault response
protocols in accordance with the needs and best practices identified within the
regional sexual assault response plans from each Louisiana Department of Health
regional medical director.
B. The subcommittee shall consist of the following thirteen members:
(1) The statewide SANE coordinator or his designee.
(2) One practicing SANE-trained nurse, appointed by the attorney general,
who is affiliated with any state SANE nurse association.
(3) The president of the Louisiana State Board of Nursing or his designee.
(4) The chief medical officer within the Louisiana Department of Health,
office of public health, or his designee.
(5) The president of the Louisiana Hospital Association, or his designee.
(6) The executive director of the Louisiana Foundation Against Sexual
Assault or his designee.
(7) The executive director of the Louisiana Alliance of Children's Advocacy
Centers or his designee.
(8) The president of the Louisiana State Coroner's Association or his
designee.
(9) The executive director of the Louisiana District Attorneys Association
or his designee.
(10) The executive director of the Louisiana Sheriffs' Association or his
designee.
(11) The executive director of Louisiana Association of Chiefs of Police or
his designee.
(12) The superintendent of Louisiana State Police or his designee.
(13) The executive director of the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice or his designee.
Page 3 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
C. The statewide SANE coordinator or his designee shall serve as chairman
of the subcommittee. Members of the subcommittee shall serve at the pleasure of
the appointing authority and without compensation. Travel expenses, per diem, and
other expenses may be paid by the member's employer or appointing authority. The
office of the attorney general shall provide staff and administrative services needed
by the subcommittee to carry out the duties set forth in this Section.
D. The subcommittee shall fix a time and place for its meetings and shall
meet at least once every four months. Additional meetings may be held upon the call
of the chairman.
E. A majority of the total subcommittee membership constitutes a quorum
and any official action by the subcommittee requires an affirmative vote of a
majority of the quorum present and voting.
* * *
§622. Sexual assault collection kits
A. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(3) "Reported sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault collection
kit collected from a survivor who has reported the crime to law enforcement, which
indicates the survivor has requested that the case proceed as a criminal investigation
and potential prosecution of the suspect.
(3) (4) "Sexual assault collection kit" means a human biological specimen
or specimens collected by a health care provider during a forensic medical
examination from the victim of a sexually oriented criminal offense the human
biological specimens and associated evidence collected by a healthcare provider
during a forensic medical examination for the purpose of documenting, preserving,
and analyzing evidence of a sexual assault, and means the standardized sexual
assault collection kit issued by the Louisiana State Police.
(4) (5) "Sexually oriented criminal offense" shall have has the same meaning
as sex offense as defined in R.S. 15:541(24).
Page 4 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
(6) "Unreported sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault
collection kit collected from a survivor who declines to report the crime to law
enforcement at the time of the examination, which indicates the survivor has
requested that no criminal investigation or prosecution be initiated, while retaining
the right to report the crime and convert the kit to a reported status at any time within
the twenty-year retention period.
(5) (7) "Untested sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault
collection kit that has not been submitted to the Louisiana State Police Crime
Laboratory or a similar qualified laboratory for either a serology or deoxyribonucleic
acid (DNA) test.
* * *
§624. Sexually oriented criminal offense data; reporting
A.(1) By February fifteenth of each year, each criminal justice agency,
including college and university campus police departments, shall report all of the
following information for the prior calendar year to the Louisiana Commission on
Law Enforcement and the Administration of Criminal Justice and the statewide
SANE coordinator as provided in R.S. 40:1228.1 et seq., within the Louisiana
Department of Justice:
* * *
B. By February fifteenth of each year, each crime laboratory shall report the
number of sexual assault collection kits in their backlog for the prior calendar year
to the Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and the Administration of
Criminal Justice and to the statewide SANE coordinator as provided in R.S.
40:1228.1 et seq., within the Louisiana Department of Justice.
C. By February fifteenth of each year, each Louisiana Department of Health
regional medical director shall submit his regional sexual assault response plan to the
chief medical officer within the Louisiana Department of Health, office of public
health, and the statewide SANE coordinator with inclusion of identified regional
gaps of access to forensic medical examinations.
Page 5 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
D. By February fifteenth of each year, the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and Administration of Criminal Justice shall submit to the statewide
SANE coordinator the previous year's grants and expenditures towards SANE
services within each Louisiana Department of Health region.
C. E.(1) By March first of each year, the Louisiana Commission on Law
Enforcement and the Administration of Criminal Justice shall transmit the
information required in Subsections A and B of this Section to the chairman of the
Senate Committee on Judiciary B and the chairman of the House Committee on
Judiciary.
(2) The report shall also include the name and contact information of each
criminal justice agency, including each college and university campus police
department and each crime laboratory, that failed to submit the report required by
Subsections A and B of this Section.
D. F. As used in this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Criminal justice agency" means any government agency or subunit
thereof, or private agency that, through statutory authorization or a legal formal
agreement with a governmental unit or agency, has the power of investigation, arrest,
detention, prosecution, adjudication, treatment, supervision, rehabilitation or release
of persons suspected, charged, or convicted of a crime; or that collects, stores,
processes, transmits, or disseminates criminal history records or crime information.
(2) "Reported sexual assault collection kit" means a kit that contains a
human biological specimen or specimens collected during a forensic medical
examination from the victim of a sexually oriented criminal offense who reported the
crime to law enforcement a sexual assault collection kit collected from a survivor
who has reported the crime to law enforcement, which indicates the survivor has
requested that the case proceed as a criminal investigation and potential prosecution
of the suspect.
(3) "Sexual assault collection kit" means a kit that is designed to assist in the
preservation of a human biological specimen or specimens collected during a
Page 6 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
forensic medical examination from the victim of a sexually oriented criminal offense
the human biological specimens and associated evidence collected by a healthcare
provider during a forensic medical examination for the purpose of documenting,
preserving, and analyzing evidence of a sexual assault, and means the standardized
sexual assault collection kit issued by the Louisiana State Police.
(4) "Sexually oriented criminal offense" includes any sexual assault offense
as defined in R.S. 44:51 and any sexual abuse offense as defined in R.S. 14:403.
(5) "Unreported sexual assault collection kit" means a kit that contains a
human biological specimen or specimens collected during a forensic medical
examination from the victim of a sexually oriented criminal offense who declined
to report the crime to law enforcement sexual assault collection kit collected from
a survivor who declines to report the crime to law enforcement at the time of the
examination, which indicates the survivor has requested that no criminal
investigation or prosecution be initiated, while retaining the right to report the crime
and convert the kit to a reported status at any time within the twenty-year retention
period.
§624.1. Submission of sexual assault collection kits
* * *
B. The statewide sexual assault collection kit tracking system shall:
* * *
(2) Designate sexual assault collection kits as unreported sexual assault
collection kits or reported sexual assault collection kits.
* * *
C. The office of state police may phase in initial participation according to
region or volume of sexual assault collection kits.
* * *
I. For the purposes of this Section, the following terms have the following
meanings:
Page 7 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
(1) "Reported sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault collection
kit where a law enforcement agency has received a related report or complaint
alleging that a sexual assault or other crime occurred collected from a survivor who
has reported the crime to law enforcement, which indicates the survivor has
requested that the case proceed as a criminal investigation and potential prosecution
of the suspect.
(2) "Sexual assault collection kit" includes all evidence collected during a
sexual assault medical forensic examination means the human biological specimens
and associated evidence collected by a healthcare provider during a forensic medical
examination for the purpose of documenting, preserving, and analyzing evidence of
a sexual assault, and means the standardized sexual assault collection kit issued by
the Louisiana State Police.
(3) "Unreported sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault
collection kit where a law enforcement agency has not received a related report or
complaint alleging that a sexual assault has occurred collected from a survivor who
declines to report the crime to law enforcement at the time of the examination, which
indicates the survivor has requested that no criminal investigation or prosecution be
initiated, while retaining the right to report the crime and convert the kit to a reported
status at any time within the twenty-year retention period.
Section 2. R.S. 40:1216.1(H)(introductory paragraph), (5), and (7) are hereby
amended and reenacted and Part XI of Subchapter D of Chapter 5-D of Title 40 of the
Louisiana Revised Statutes of 1950, comprised of R.S. 40:1228.1 through 1228.11, is hereby
enacted to read as follows:
§1216.1. Procedures for survivors of a sexually oriented criminal offense;
immunity; regional plans; maximum allowable costs; definitions; documents
requested by victim
* * *
H. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
* * *
Page 8 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
(5) "Sexual assault collection kit" includes all evidence collected during a
forensic medical examination means the human biological specimens and associated
evidence collected by a healthcare provider during a forensic medical examination
for the purpose of documenting, preserving, and analyzing evidence of a sexual
assault, and means the standardized sexual assault collection kit issued by the
Louisiana State Police.
* * *
(7) "Unreported sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault
collection kit where a law enforcement agency has not received a related report or
complaint alleging that a sexual assault has occurred collected from a survivor who
declines to report the crime to law enforcement at the time of the examination, which
indicates the survivor has requested that no criminal investigation or prosecution be
initiated, while retaining the right to report the crime and convert the kit to a reported
status at any time within the twenty-year retention period.
* * *
PART XI. SERVICES FOR SURVIVORS OF SEXUALLY ORIENTED CRIMINAL
OFFENSES ACCESS ACT
§1228.1. Short title
This Part shall be known and may be cited as the "Services For Survivors of
Sexually Oriented Criminal Offenses Access Act".
§1228.2. Findings and purpose
A. The legislature hereby finds and declares all of the following:
(1) Sexual assault is a serious public health and criminal justice issue that
affects individuals of all ages, genders, and backgrounds throughout the state of
Louisiana.
(2) Timely, high-quality forensic medical examinations by a trained sexual
assault nurse examiner, referred to in this Part as "SANE", are critical to ensuring
survivor-centered care, collecting forensic evidence, and supporting prosecution of
sexual assault offenders.
Page 9 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
(3) Access to SANE services is uneven across the state, with significant gaps
in rural and underserved regions.
(4) Establishing a statewide SANE coordinator and regional mobile SANE
nurse teams will improve equitable access to forensic nursing services for survivors
of sexual assault throughout the state.
B. The purpose of this Part is to ensure that every survivor of sexual assault
in this state has access to a trained sexual assault nurse examiner regardless of
geographic location, and to establish a coordinated, sustainable statewide
infrastructure for the performance of forensic medical examinations for survivors of
sexually oriented offenses.
§1228.3. Definitions
For the purposes of this Part, the following terms have the following
meanings:
(1) "Department" means the Louisiana Department of Justice.
(2) "Forensic medical examination" has the same meaning as defined in R.S.
15:622.
(3) "Healthcare provider" means either of the following:
(a) A physician, sexual assault nurse examiner, or other healthcare
practitioner licensed, certified, registered, or otherwise authorized and trained to
perform a forensic medical examination.
(b) A licensed hospital that operates an emergency department.
(4) "Healthcare services" means services, items, supplies, or drugs for the
diagnosis, prevention, treatment, cure, or relief of a health condition, illness, injury,
or disease ancillary to a sexually oriented criminal offense.
(5) "Reported sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault collection
kit collected from a survivor who has reported the crime to law enforcement and
affirmatively requests that the case proceed as a criminal investigation and potential
prosecution of the suspect.
Page 10 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
(6) "Sexual assault collection kit" means the human biological specimens
and associated evidence collected by a healthcare provider during a forensic medical
examination for the purpose of documenting, preserving, and analyzing evidence of
a sexual assault, and means the standardized sexual assault collection kit issued by
the Louisiana State Police.
(7) "Sexually oriented criminal offense" has the same meaning as defined in
R.S. 15:622.
(8) "Sexual Assault Nurse Examiner" or "SANE" means a registered nurse
who has received specialized training as determined by the Sexual Assault Response
Standards Subcommittee in conducting forensic medical examinations for survivors
of sexually oriented criminal offenses.
(9) "Unreported sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault
collection kit collected from a survivor who declines to report the crime to law
enforcement at the time of the examination and requests that no criminal
investigation or prosecution be initiated, while retaining the right to report the crime
and convert the kit to a reported status at any time within the twenty-year retention
period.
§1228.4. Statewide SANE coordinator; creation; duties
A. The department shall create and maintain the position of statewide sexual
assault nurse examiner, or SANE, coordinator. The statewide SANE coordinator
shall be trained as a SANE nurse in accordance with applicable national or statewide
guidelines and have at least two years of experience as a practicing SANE.
B. The duties of the statewide SANE coordinator shall include all of the
following:
(1) Developing, implementing, and overseeing a statewide strategic plan for
SANE services.
(2) Developing, implementing, and overseeing a plan to develop mobile
SANE teams across the state within the public health regions of the Louisiana
Department of Health.
Page 11 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
(3) Developing and maintaining standardized protocols, policies, and
procedures for sexual assault forensic examinations consistent with current best
practices as established by applicable accrediting bodies, the United States
Department of Justice, and other relevant authorities.
(4) Serving as a member of both the Louisiana Sexual Assault Oversight
Commission as provided in R.S. 15:555 and the Sexual Assault Response Standards
Subcommittee as provided in R.S. 15:557.
(5) In conjunction with the Sexual Assault Response Standards
Subcommittee as provided in R.S. 15:557, establishing and overseeing the following:
(a) Mandatory initial and continuing training requirements for all SANE
nurses providing services in the state, ensuring that trauma-informed and
evidence-based protocols are integrated into all education and practice settings.
(b) A statewide preceptor network, aligned with existing and available best
practice guidelines from both national and state organizations.
(6) Maintaining a statewide database tracking SANE service utilization,
response times, and gaps in coverage.
(7) Conducting a statewide assessment of access to forensic medical
examinations and developing a statewide coverage plan within two years of the
assessment's completion to ensure twenty-four-hour access to services in every
parish.
(8) Serving as the primary point of contact and liaison between the
department and hospitals, healthcare facilities, Louisiana sexual assault centers,
children's advocacy centers, law enforcement, district attorneys, and other
stakeholders regarding SANE services. Any healthcare facility, sexual assault
center, children's advocacy center, law enforcement agency, child protective services
agency, or other entity involved in the administration, documentation, or handling
of sexual assault forensic examinations or the care of the survivor shall report
incidents involving procedural deviation, evidence compromise, or patient safety
concerns. The SANE coordinator shall develop, receive, and retain all incident
reports and ensure appropriate review, investigation, and system oversight.
Page 12 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
(9) Facilitating annual meetings in all regions of the state to solicit the input
of interested stakeholders in the region, including but not limited to all of the
following:
(a) Any SANE programs within the region.
(b) The coroner for each parish within the region.
(c) The sheriff for each parish within the region.
(d) The chief of police for any political subdivision located within the region.
(e) All hospitals with an emergency department located within the region.
(f) First responder organizations located within the region.
(g) Higher education institutions located within the region.
(h) The school board for each parish located within the region.
(i) Sexual assault advocacy organizations and children's advocacy centers
providing services within the region.
(j) The district attorney for each parish within the region or his designee.
(k) Each crime lab located within the region.
(l) Any nursing school in the region.
(10) In addition to the reporting requirements provided in R.S. 15:624,
submitting an annual report to the governor, attorney general, the president of the
Senate, and the speaker of the House of Representatives that details program
activities, service utilization data, identified needs, and recommendations for
improvement.
(11) Applying for and administering federal grants, federal funding, and any
other available funding sources to support SANE services statewide.
(12) Performing any other duties as the attorney general may assign
consistent with the purposes of this Part.
§1228.5. TeleSANE training and mobile SANE program
A. The department shall establish and oversee a statewide teleSANE training
program and a mobile SANE program as managed within the public health regions
of the Louisiana Department of Health to provide forensic medical examination
Page 13 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
support and forensic medical examinations for survivors of sexually oriented
criminal offenses.
B. Each mobile SANE nurse or team within each public health region shall
have the capacity to do all of the following:
(1) Be available on an on-call or scheduled basis to respond to requests for
SANE services within respective assigned regions on a twenty-four-hour,
seven-day-a-week basis.
(2) Respond to requests for service and arrive at the designated examination
site within a reasonable time, with a goal of responding within one hour of
notification for acute forensic medical examinations when possible and with
consideration of geographic parameters within the region and resulting travel time
required for SANE nurse response.
(3) Coordinate with hospitals, law enforcement, Louisiana sexual assault
center advocates, children's advocacy centers, and other responders to ensure
trauma-informed, victim-centered care.
(4) Provide services at any appropriate location within the region including
but not limited to hospital emergency departments, outpatient clinics, parish health
units, Louisiana sexual assault centers, children's advocacy centers, and law
enforcement facilities as agreed upon by the relevant entities.
C. All sexual assault collection kits used in a forensic medical examination
shall meet the standards developed by the department in collaboration with the
Sexual Assault Response Standards Subcommittee.
§1228.6. Reports to law enforcement
A. A licensed hospital or healthcare provider shall adhere to the following
procedures if a person presents for treatment as a sexual assault survivor:
(1) The hospital shall contact its regional SANE program to request that a
SANE nurse or SANE team be dispatched to the hospital or other location to perform
a forensic medical examination in coordination with available advocacy
programming.
Page 14 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
(2)(a) Except as provided in Subparagraphs (b) and (c) of this Paragraph, a
survivor shall decide whether or not to report the incident to law enforcement
officials. No SANE nurse, SANE team, hospital, or healthcare provider shall require
the survivor to report the incident to receive medical attention or collect evidence.
(b) If a person under the age of eighteen presents for treatment as a sexual
assault survivor, the SANE nurse, SANE team, hospital, or healthcare provider shall
immediately notify the appropriate law enforcement agency or any other official
necessary to fulfill any mandatory reporting obligation required by law.
(c) If a survivor is physically or mentally incapable of making the decision
to report, the hospital or healthcare provider shall immediately notify the appropriate
law enforcement officials.
(d) If the survivor wishes to report the incident to law enforcement, the
hospital, a healthcare provider, or the SANE examiner shall contact the appropriate
law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the location where the crime occurred
for the purpose of transferring the reported sexual assault collection kit to the law
enforcement agency. If the location where the crime occurred cannot be determined,
the hospital or healthcare provider shall contact the law enforcement agency with
jurisdiction over the location where the forensic medical examination is performed
to determine the appropriate investigating agency for the purpose of transferring the
reported sexual assault collection kit to the law enforcement agency.
B.(1) Any member of the hospital staff or a healthcare provider who, in good
faith, notifies the appropriate law enforcement official pursuant to Paragraph (A)(2)
of this Section is immune from any civil liability that otherwise could be incurred or
imposed because of the notification.
(2) All reports made by the hospital or healthcare provider staff member
shall be made through the appropriate law enforcement agency dispatch. The
hospital or healthcare provider staff member shall obtain a file number and the
responding officer's name, and document the date, time, method of notification, and
the name of the official who received the notification to ensure compliance with this
Section.
Page 15 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
§1228.7. Examination; advocate
A. Every sexual assault survivor shall be examined and treated by a qualified
healthcare provider, without undue delay, in a private space required to ensure the
health, safety, and welfare of the survivor. Examination and treatment, including the
forensic medical examination, shall be adapted as necessary to address the unique
needs and circumstances of each survivor. All survivors shall be afforded an
advocate whose communications are privileged in accordance with the provisions of
R.S. 46:2187, if one is available. With the consent of the survivor, an advocate shall
remain in the examination room during the forensic medical examination. With the
consent of the survivor, the examination and treatment of all sexual assault survivors
shall be in accordance with the Sexual Assault Survivor Bill of Rights as provided
in R.S. 46:1845.
B.(1) If the survivor does not wish to report the incident to law enforcement,
the SANE nurse or SANE team shall, upon completion of the forensic medical
examination, ensure the unreported sexual assault collection kit is not identified or
labeled with the survivor's identifying information and do either of the following:
(a) Contact the law enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the location
where the forensic medical examination was performed to transfer possession of the
unreported sexual assault collection kit for storage. The law enforcement agency
shall maintain all unreported sexual assault collection kits for a period of twenty
years.
(b) In a jurisdiction with a coroner-based SANE program that has the ability
to retain kits in accordance with evidentiary standards and proper chain of custody,
contact the coroner's office to transfer possession of the unreported sexual assault
collection kit for storage. The coroner shall maintain all unreported sexual assault
collection kits for a period of twenty years.
(2) No unreported sexual assault collection kit shall remain at a hospital or
medical facility if the hospital or medical facility is unable to store the sexual assault
collection kit in a secure location that ensures proper chain of custody. If a hospital
or medical facility has a secure location that ensures proper chain of custody, the law
Page 16 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
enforcement agency with jurisdiction over the location where the forensic medical
examination was performed shall take possession of the unreported sexual assault
collection kit within seventy-two hours upon notification of completion of the sexual
assault collection kit by the hospital or healthcare provider. An unreported sexual
assault collection kit shall be transferred to the law enforcement agency with
jurisdiction solely for the purpose of secure storage for the duration required by law.
The initiation of a criminal investigation or submission of the unreported sexual
assault collection kit to a forensic laboratory is not required unless the survivor elects
to report the incident.
§1228.8. Prohibition on billing for forensic medical examination
A. No hospital, healthcare provider, nor the statewide SANE coordinator
shall directly bill a survivor of a sexually oriented criminal offense for any healthcare
services rendered in conducting a forensic medical examination, including the
healthcare services provided for in R.S. 15:622(A)(2) and any of the following:
(1) Forensic examiner and hospital or healthcare facility services directly
related to the examination, including integral forensic supplies.
(2) Scope procedures directly related to the forensic medical examination,
including but not limited to anoscopy and colposcopy.
(3) Any testing related to the sexual assault or recommended by the
healthcare provider.
(4) Any medication provided during the forensic medical examination.
B. The healthcare provider who conducted the forensic medical examination
and the hospital or healthcare facility where the forensic medical examination was
conducted shall submit a claim for reimbursement directly to the Crime Victims'
Compensation Board, to be paid in accordance with the provisions of R.S. 46:1822.
C. The provisions of this Section do not apply to either of the following:
(1) A healthcare provider billing for any medical services that are not
specifically set forth in this Section or provided for diagnosis or treatment of the
survivor for injuries related to the sexual assault.
Page 17 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
(2) A survivor of a sexually oriented criminal offense seeking reparations in
accordance with the Crime Victims Reparations Act, R.S. 46:1801 et seq., for the
costs of any medical services that are not specifically set forth in this Section or
provided for the diagnosis or treatment of the survivor for injuries related to the
sexual assault.
D. The statewide SANE coordinator shall make available to every hospital
and healthcare provider licensed under the laws of this state a pamphlet containing
an explanation of the billing process for services rendered pursuant to this Section.
Every hospital and healthcare provider shall provide a copy of the pamphlet to any
person presented for treatment as a survivor of a sexually oriented criminal offense.
§1228.9. Hospital and healthcare provider standards
A. The procedures provided in this Part constitute the minimum standards
for the operation and maintenance of hospitals pursuant to this Part. Failure to
comply with these standards may constitute grounds for denial, suspension, or
revocation of the healthcare provider's license by the appropriate licensing board or
commission.
B. No hospital or healthcare provider shall refuse to examine or assist a
survivor on the grounds that the alleged offense occurred outside of or the survivor
is not a resident of the jurisdiction.
§1228.10. Reproduction of certain records
A. Upon request of a competent adult survivor of a sexually oriented
criminal offense, the healthcare provider that performed the forensic medical
examination shall provide a reproduction of any written documentation resulting
from the forensic medical examination of the survivor that is in the possession of the
healthcare provider. The documentation shall be provided to the survivor no later
than fourteen days after the healthcare provider receives the request or the healthcare
provider completes the documentation, whichever is later.
B. The reproduction of written documentation described in this Section shall
be made available at no cost to the survivor and may only be released at the direction
of the survivor who is a competent adult. The release of this documentation to the
Page 18 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
survivor does not invalidate the survivor's reasonable expectation of privacy nor does
it become a public record.
§1228.11. Coordination
A. The statewide SANE coordinator and the mobile SANE nurse program
within each public health region of the Louisiana Department of Health shall
coordinate with the following:
(1) The criminalistics laboratory within the public health region that is
authorized to conduct forensic DNA analysis of sexual assault collection kits
regarding statewide standards for kit collection, documentation, storage, transfer, and
processing in order to ensure uniform policies and procedures across all participating
agencies and regions.
(2) The Louisiana Foundation Against Sexual Assault regarding sexual
assault crisis services coordination.
(3) The Louisiana Alliance of Children's Advocacy Centers.
(4) The Louisiana Department of Children and Family Services.
(5) The Louisiana State Board of Nursing.
(6) The Louisiana Commission on Law Enforcement and Administration of
Criminal Justice.
B. The department shall enter into memoranda of understanding or other
formal agreements as appropriate with hospitals, healthcare facilities, and other
entities to facilitate the provision of mobile SANE services.
C. The department may enter into a memorandum of understanding with
other state agencies in order to effectuate the provisions of this Part.
Section 3. R.S. 44:4.1(B)(27) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4.1. Exceptions
* * *
B. The legislature further recognizes that there exist exceptions, exemptions,
and limitations to the laws pertaining to public records throughout the revised
statutes and codes of this state. Therefore, the following exceptions, exemptions, and
Page 19 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
limitations are hereby continued in effect by incorporation into this Chapter by
citation:
* * *
(27) R.S. 40:3.1, 31.14, 31.27, 39.1, 41, 73, 95, 96, 526, 528, 973.1, 978.2.1,
1007, 1061.21, 1079.18, 1081.10, 1105.6, 1105.8, 1125.14, 1133.8, 1168.3, 1171.4,
1203.4, 1231.4, 1228.10, 1379.1.1(D), 1379.3, 2009.8, 2009.14, 2010.5, 2017.9,
2018, 2018.5, 2019, 2020, 2106, 2109.1, 2138, 2175.7(B)(1), 2193.6, 2532, 2845.1
* * *
Section 4. R.S. 46:1842(introductory paragraph) and (14) are hereby amended and
reenacted and R.S. 46:1842(20) and (21) are hereby enacted to read as follows:
§§11.842. Definitions
In this Chapter, the following terms have the following meanings:
* * *
(14) "Sexual assault collection kit" has the same meaning as provided in R.S.
15:624 means the human biological specimens and associated evidence collected by
a healthcare provider during a forensic medical examination for the purpose of
documenting, preserving, and analyzing evidence of a sexual assault, and means the
standardized sexual assault collection kit issued by the Louisiana State Police.
* * *
(20) "Reported sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault
collection kit collected from a survivor who has reported the crime to law
enforcement, which indicates the survivor has requested that the case proceed as a
criminal investigation and potential prosecution of the suspect.
(21) "Unreported sexual assault collection kit" means a sexual assault
collection kit collected from a survivor who declines to report the crime to law
enforcement at the time of the examination, which indicates the survivor has
requested that no criminal investigation or prosecution be initiated, while retaining
the right to report the crime and convert the kit to a reported status at any time within
the twenty-year retention period.
Page 20 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HB NO. 1247 ENROLLED
Section 5. The Louisiana State Law Institute is hereby authorized and directed to
alphabetize and renumber the Paragraphs of R.S. 46:1842 so as to properly place in
alphabetical order R.S. 46:1842(20) and (21) as enacted by this Act.
Section 6. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 21 of 21
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.